print/tex/TeX3.14/contrib/tex/hyphen/hyphen.german.tex
3scha.
5schade
3schaf
5schal
sch5ame
7schanz
7schare
sch7art.
8schb
1sche
s8che.
6schef
sch7ess
8schex
2schf
2schg
2schh
1schi
2schk
s8chl
5schlag
1scho
6sch7ord
8schow
8schp
8schq
3schri
8schric
8schrig
8schrou
6schs
2s8cht
sch5ta
sch3tr
1s8chu
8schunt
6schv
2schz
7s8ci
sci7e
s7cl
2sco
7scop
scre6
6scu
2s1d
1se
se5an
se1ap
se7at.
se6ben
8s7eck
se7ec
se6e5i6
se3erl
8seff
sef8l
se7gh
se8hi
sei8ches
6s5eid.
7s8eide
2s1eig
seil8le.
5s6ein.
8s7eind
sei5n6e
6s5einh
se7isc
5s6eit
se4lar
sel7d8
se8l7e8b
6s3e4lem
4s1emp
sen3ac
se7nau.
se5nec
sen8stri
6s5ents
se7op
se8rad
se8r7eim
ser8ge.
ser5inn
6s5erzi
se7ts
se1um
se8vr
sex7am
sex7e
6sexp
2s1f2
sfal8ler
2s3g2
sge7b2
s1h
7s8ha.
sha8ke.
sha8r
s8has
shi8o
5s6hip
s8hir
s8hm
5s4hop
s8how
sh8r
s8ht
7s8hw
1si
2siat
si1b
7sic
sicht6s5
si8deb
6s5i6dee
siege6s5
si1en
si5err
si7etz
si1f2
si1g2n
si6g5r
si8kau
sik1i
si4kin
si2kl
si1la
sila7u
sil6br
si1na
sin8au
2s1inf
sin5gh
2s1inh
2s1ins
si7od
si8re.
si7ru
si5str
s7i8x
4s1j
s1k2
6sk.
sk8a
skani7e
2skau
skel6c
skelch5
s6kele
7s2ki.
7skik
3s4kin.
7s6kiz
6skn
8sko.
2skow
s7kre
5skript
sk7t
2sku
7s8ky
s1l
7s8lal
s8lav
slei3t
sli8ce
7s8lid
sli8de
7s8lip
s4low
2s1m
smani7e
s1n
6sna
8sne
6snot
1so
so1ch
2s1odo
so4dor
6s5o4fen
s7ohne
8s7ohr
s7okt
so8l7ei
s8on
son7end
so5of
6sope
s7opf
so1ra
2s1ord
4sorga
sou5c
so3un
so8ve7
6s5ox
sp2
8spaa
1spal
1s8pan
spani7e
8spap
1spas
s5pau
8spe.
s8pea
7s2pec
s8pee
s4peis
1spek
s6perg
4spers
s6pes
7s8pex
2s5pf
1spi
spi8e
6s5pig
6spinse
2spis
2spla
3spli
s7pn
2spol
5s6pom
7s8pond
6s5pos
1spra
5s8prec
6spreis
4sprob
7spucke
s2pul
1s2pur
6spy
s1q
2s1r
srich7
2s1s2
s7sa
ssali7e
sse8nu
ssini6s
ssoi6r
6st.
1sta
6stafe
2stag
6stale
4stalg
8st7alk
st8all
7stalo
7stame
st7a8mi
8stamt
6stanf
4stans
6stanw
6starb
sta4te
6staus
2stb
st7c
6std
1ste
st7ebe
4steil
st7ekt
3s2tel
st3elb
8st7emb
ste6n5e
7steni
6steppi
8stese
8steuf
6stf
2stg
2sth
st1ha
s8t1hi
st1ho
st5hu
1sti
7stie
sti4el
4stigm
6stind
4stinf
8s7tint
sti8r
7stiv
4stk
2stl
2stm
1sto
6stoll.
4st3ope
6stopf.
6st7ord
8stov
6stp
stra6fa
6strai
3stral
s7trate
6s5traum
6s5tref
8streib
5streif
6streno
6stres
6strev
5s6tria
6strig
5strik
8strisi
3stroa
st7roll
7stroma
st5rose
3stru
4struf
2st1s6
2s8tt
1stu
stu5a
4stuc
2stue
8stun.
st7urk
2stv
2stw
s2tyl
6stz
1su
su2b1
su8bl
3suc
su1e
su2fe
su7ist.
su8mar
6sumfa
8s7umk
6sunf
2s1unt
sup1p8
6s5u6ran
6surte
sus7e
2s1v
sval8l
2s1w
1sy
sy7a
8syl.
sy5la
syn1
syne4
s1z
s7zei
s4zend
5s6zene.
taats3
4tab.
taba6k
ta8ban
tab8li
ta6bre
6tabs
t5absc
t7abst
8tabz
6t3acht
8t7a6der
6tadr
tad6s
tad6t
1tafe4
tafel5
1tag
ta6ga6
ta8g7ei
tage4s3
tag7h
ta7gl
tag6s5t
tah8
tahl3
ta7ik
tai6ne.
ta5ir.
tak8ta
ta4l3au
1tale
tal5ert
tali8q
8t7alph
6t5a6mer
tami7e
8tamm
ta7mn
6tamp
tampe6
2t1amt
8tan8c
tan7d8a
tan8dr
tands5a
tani5e
6t5anker
tan8kr
6tanl
7tann
t7anna
t8a7n8o
2tanr
t5ansa
t3anst
t5antr
tan8tro
tanu6
t5anw
8tanwa
tan8zw
ta8pe.
6tapf
t8ar.
ta8rau
6tarbe
8t7arc
tare7i
1tari
2tark
2t1arm
ta1ro
2tart
t3arti
6tarz
7ta1sc
ta8stem
ta8sto
ta8sy
8t7as8z
ta7ta
taub5l
4taufn
8taus.
5tause
6tausf
6tausg
t3auss
tau7st
4tauto
2t1b2
2tc
t1che
tch7w
2t1d
te8ac
te2am
tea6s
te8ben
5techn
4teff
te4g3re
te8hau
2tehe
te4hel
te5id.
teig5l
6teign
1teil
4teinh
t5einhe
2teis
te7isch.
t5eise
te8l7a8b
te8lam
te8l7au
telbi7e
4telek
8telem
te6man
t8ena
te6nag
te7nak
t6enb
8t7en8c
8t7endern
8t7enders
te8nei
ten8erw
ten5k
ten3s4p
6t5entf
ten8tro
te7ore
te6pli
5teppi
ter5a6b
te3ral
ter5au
8terbar
t5erbe.
6terben
8terbs
4t3erbt
tercre8
t5erde.
ter5ebe
ter5ein
ter7ek
ter7ent
te8r7ers
terf4
te8r7id
te8r7inse
ter1k
7termi
ter8nor
ter6re.
ter8rea
t8erscha
t8erste
t6erstu
ter7t8
teru8
tes7ac
t5e6sel
3teste
t8et
te7tho
7teuf
t5euro
te1xa
tex3e
8texo
7text
2t1f2
2t1g2
tge1n
2th.
5t8ha.
2thaa
6t1hab
6t5haf
7t8hag
t5hah
tha7is
8thak
3thal.
6thals
6t3hand
t7hap
2t1hau
1the.
3t4hea
t1heb
7thee
t5heil
the7isc
t3heit
4t3helf
the7na
1theo
5therap
5therf
t7herg
6t5herz
1thes
1thet
t8heu
8thg
5thi.
7t8hia
2t1hil
t3him
8t7hir
3this
t5hj
8thk
2th1l
2th1m
th1n
t5hob
t5hof
4tholz
6thopti
t7hou
t7hov
1thr6
7th8ra
thre8
6ths
8t1hum
1thy
ti7alo
ti1a2m
ti1b
tie6fer
ti3ell
ti1en
tie7s
ti7fr
tig3l
ti8kin
tik7t
ti5lat
1tilg
tim6ma
ti5nak
t7inan
t1ind
tin4k3l
t8is
tis7ant
tisch5l
tisch7w
ti7sl
ti5str
5tite
ti5tr
ti8vel
ti8vr
2t1j
2t1k2
tku4r
2t1l
tl8a
tl8e
t8lem
2t1m
2t1n
t7n8e
3tobe
8tobj
t7obs
to3cha
t7ochs
5tocht
8tock
tode4
to8del
t7o8do
to1e
t5o6fen
to1in
toi6r
toi8se
5toll.
toma7i
to8mene
7tonn
2t1ony
to4per
5topf.
6t7opt
to1ra
8torc
to7ru
to1s
to6ska
tos2l
to7sth
7tot.
2toti
to1tr
7t8ou
7town
2t1p2
t7po
6t1q
tr2
tra7a
tra8dem
1trag
tra6gl
t3rahm
1trai
t6rans
tra3sc
tra6st
3traue
7trauf
t4re.
8treal
2trec
t3rech
t8reck
7t8reco
6t1red
t8ree
2t1reg
3treib
4treif
t7reih
t3reis
t7repo
5trete
tre6t5r
tret7s
t3rev
4t3rez
8t7rh
1trib
t6rick
7trieb
tri8el.
tri6er
tri7est.
tri7eur
2trig
3t8rink
t8rio
tri6o5d
tri7pti
trizi5
tro1a
5troc
trocke6
troi8d
tro8m7an
3tromp
tro3ny
7tropf
6t5rosa
t7rot.
5trub
5trup
trut5
2ts
t6s1ab
t7sac
t8s7a8d
ts1ak
t6s5alt
t2s1an
t2s1ar
t7sat
ts3auf
ts8ch
8tsch.
7t8schek
tschi8e
t3schr
t8s7e8h
t4s3ent
t8s7erf
ts5erl
ts7erw
t8s7es
t6sh
t7s8hu
5t6sik
t8sin.
t4s3int
t6s5ort.
t5s6por
t1spr
t6sprei
t6spro
t1st
t6s5tanz
t8s7tes
ts1th
t8s7tis
t6stit
t7stoc
t4s3tor
1t2sua
t2s1uf
t8s7um.
t2s1u8n
t2s1ur
2t1t
tt7abl
tt1c
ttcre8
tt5eif
tt7eis
tte6sa
tt1ha
tt7hen
tt7hu
tt8ret
tt7rot
tt1sc
tt5s6z
tt7z
tu7ala
tu7alm
tuan8
tu7ant
3tuc
tuch5a
tu7cho
tu8de.
1tu1e
6tuh
t5uhr
tu1i
tu6it
1tumh
6t5umr
1tums
8t7umt
t7umz
5tun.
6tund
tu8ne.
8tunf
2t1unt
tu5ra
tu6rab
tu6rau
tu6re.
tu6r5er
2t1v
tve2
tvil7
2t1w
1ty
8tym
6tyo
typ7erw
2tz
tz1an
tz1ar
tz5aus
t8z7ec
tzeh6
tzehn5
t6z5ei.
t8z7eis
tz7or
t6z5um
uad8r
u3al.
ua8lan
u5alb
u5alf
u3alh
u5alk
u5alp
u7alre
u3an.
ua5n8a
u3and
u5ans
u5ar.
ua8re.
u7at.
u1au
ua1y8
u2bab
u8barb
u7be
ube8nei
ubi5er.
u7blo
ubs2k
2uc
uch7am
uch5au
u1che
u6ch5ec
uches8
u1chi
uch1l
uch3m
uch5n
uch7op
uch1r
uch8sti
uch5to
ucht7ra
ucht5re
u1chu
uch1w
ucis7
uck1a
uck5in
u7cl
u1d
ud4a
ueen8
u8eg
u1ei
u6ela
ue8n7a
uene8
uen8g7l
u6ep
u1er
uer1a
uer7eif
u7e8r7erl
ueri8t
uer7k
uer5o
ue8roa
uer8re.
u8esc
u2est
ue8te
uet7z
u8ev
u2f1ei
u4f3ent
uf1l
uf1ra
uf1re
uf1sp
uft1s
u8gabt
u8gad
u6gap
u8g7au
ugeb8
ug7hu
u8gn
ugo3s4
u1ha
u1he
uh7eu
u1hi
uh5la
uh1le
uhme8
u1ho
uh1re
uh7ri
uhs8
u1hu
uh1w
6ui
ui8che
ui7en
u1ig
u8ik
uin8e
u3ins
uin8tes
ui8pe
u5isch.
ui8ser
u7ism
u1j
6uk
ukani7
u1ke
u1ki
u1k2l
ukle7i
uk3ler
u8klu
u1k6n
ukt8
u5ky
u1la
ul7af
u7lamm
ul8d7an
uld8se
u1le
ule7e
ule8s
u8l7ese
ul6lau
ul6le6l
ul6lo
ul8lun
u1lo
ulo6i
ul8p7h
ul7t8e
u1lu
ul2vr
uma8k
u8m7arm
um7art
7umdr
umela8
um7e8m
3umfan
umi8a
5umlau
umo8f
um8pho
um6san
u1mu
um7ue
umu8s7
u1n1a
un2al
un6at
u8nau2
6und.
5undein
8undt
un4d3um
3undzw
une2b
un1ec
une2h
un7ehr
un3eis
une8n
unen7e
unes8
3unfal
un8gab
5ungea
ung2s1
1u2nif
un4it
un8kro
unk5s
u1no
unpa2
uns2p
un8sto
8unti
unvol4
unvoll5
u7ny
uo7i
u7ors
uo7ru
u5os.
u1pa
upani7
u7pe
u1pi
u1p2l
u1pr
up7sc
up8scha
up4s3t
up2t1a
upt5id
u1q
u1ra
ur5abs
ur7a8d
ur5ah
urai8
u6rak
ur7akt
ur3alt
u6r5ans
u8r7ap
ura6ri
urasi7e
u8r7att
ur7aus
u1re
ure5a
ur3eig
ur7ein
u1ri
uri8c
uriti7e
ur8mei
ur8nan
u1ro
u8r7ody
3ursac
ur8s7au
ur4sk
3urtei
ur7t8l
u1ru
uru5i6
uru6r
u1ry
ur2za
urz5w
us3a4gi
us7ang
u2s1ar
u2s1au
u8sch7ec
usch7m
u7schra
use7b
u2s1ei
use8kel
us3erk
us3erl
us7ers
us7im
us7int
u8sl
us7oc
u7spi
ussu8r
u4st3a4b
u7stal
us3tap
us3tau
u3ster
ustiz5
u8stot
ust8ren
u2s1uf
u8s7urn
u7ta.
u1tal
ut7a8m
u1tan
ut7anc
ut1ar
u1tas
ut7aw
u1te
u8te8d
uteil8
u4t3eng
u6terin
uter8n
ut7hal
u4t3hei
ut5ho
ut1hu
u1ti
utine5
utini8
uti6q
u1to
uto5c
u1tr
ut7rel
ut1s6p
ut6s5tr
u1tu
u1u
u1v
u8vef
uvel8
uve5n
uvet8
u8veti
u1w
u7xa
u1xe
u5ya
uy5e6
u1yi
u2z1eh
uz7ot
va7c
va8ch
8v7anb
6vang
vanta8
6varb
va6t5a
va8tei
va8tin7
vat7ini
va2t1r
2v1b
v7ch
6vd
veau7
6ve5g6
8v7eh
ve7in
ve8lor
ve7nab
vento8
ver1
vera8s
ver7b
verb8l
ve2re2
ver7st
7vert
ve2ru8
verz8
ve2s3p
vete7
veti7e
ve3xe
2v1f
2v1g
6v5h
vi7et
vie6w5
vi1g
vi8leh
vil6le.
vi8nai
8vint
vi8rau
vir7c
vi1ru
vi8te.
vi1tr
vi8ve
2v1k
2v1l
6vm
4v5n
8v7o8f
voi6le
vol8l7end
vol8li
von8n
vo7ny
v2or1
vo2re
vo8rin
vo2ro
vor7t8
vou6r5
2v1p
8v7ra
v6re
vre8s
2v1s
2v1t
2v1v
6vw
v7wa
2v1z
7waa
wach7tr
waffe8
waffel7
wa7ge
wa6g5n
1wah
wah8n7
wa8is
wala7
7wald
wal8din
wal6ta
wa7na7
wan8dar
wan8z7end
3ware
war8pa
wa8r7u
war4za
1was
w5c
w1d
w8da
we8a
7wech
wee8
week7
we8fl
1weg
we8g7eng
weg7ess
weg7h
we8g3l
we2g1r
weg5s
7weh
weh6r5er
w8ei
5weise
weit3r
wel8schl
wel4t
welt3a
welt3r
weni7e
we6rat
wer4bl
5werdu
wer4fl
5werk.
wer8ka
werk7erz
wer8ku
wer4ta
wer8t7erm
we2sp
west7a
we8st7end
we8steu
we8st7r
7wett
wet8ta
whi8
wich6s5t
1wid
wi2dr
wieb8
wiede4
wieder5
8wiel
wik6
7wil
wim6ma
win6d5r
wine8
wi8n7eg
3wirt
wisch5l
1wj
6wk
2w1l
w1n
wo1c
woche6
7wol6f
wo7lh
woni7e
wor7i
wor6t5r
wor7u
w7re
w7ro
6ws2
w1sk
wsto8
6w5t
7wunde.
wun6g7r
wu1sc
wu2t1
6w5w
wy5a
xa7e8
1xag
x1ak
xa6men
8x7amt
x1an
x1b
x5c
1xe.
8xed
xe8dr
x3e4g
xel8
x7eml
1x8en
x1erz
1xes
x7fr
x1h
1xi
xi7c
8xid
x8ie
xi7f
xi8so
x1k
6x1l
x1m
1xo
8xoc
8x5o6d
x3p2
x1r
x1s6
x1t
x8tab
x6tak
x8t7erf
x2t1h
1xu
xu7alt
xu7alv
xu1e
x5ul
x7u8v
x5v
6x5w
x1z
5ya.
y5an.
y5ank
y1b
y1c
y6cha
y4chia
ycho7
y1d
y8dep
yen6n
y7er.
y7erl
y5ern
8yet8
y5f
y1g
ygi7er
y1h
y5in
y7ist.
y1j
y1k2
yki7e
y5lad
y1lak
yl1al
yl7a8m
yl7ar
y5lax
y1le
yli8k
yli8n
y7l8o
y5lu
ym1p2
ympi7e
y5mu
y1na
yn7d8
yni7e
yno2d
yn1t
y7oi
y7ol.
y7om.
y1on.
y1o4p
y5ou
y1p
yper7
ypo1
y8pp
yp8r
y2ps
y2pt
y1r
yra8n
yr7ano
yre7i
y7r8i
yri3e
yr1r2
y8rw
y1s
ys5iat
y8sl
y8stek
ys8ty
ysu8
y1t
y7vi
y3w
y1z
6z1a2b
zab5l
7zac.
za6d
1zah
za7ire.
za5is
4z3ak
z7alt
z3am
8zanl
zan8n
2z1ara
za7ro
6z5as
z5atm
z5auf
3zau8n7
2z1b
6z1c
z8cz
6z1d
7zdl
1ze
ze7an.
ze4dik
ze7en
4z3eff
zeh8n7en
8z7ein
zei4t3a
zei8ters
ze6la
ze8l7ec
zel8th
zem8e
4zemp
6z5engel
zen8za
zen8zin
ze7ral
zer1k
zers8
zerta8
zer8tab
zer8tag
7zes
ze8s7t
7zet
zeu6gr
zeu8s7
2z1ex
2z1f
zf8l
z1g
4z1h
1zi
zi7a8r
zi3ell
zi1en
zi5es.
4z3imp
zi1na
6z5inf
6z5inni
zin8ser
8zinsuf
zi5th
zi1tr
6z1j
2z1k
2z1l
7z8le.
2z1m
6z1n
1zo
zo7a
zo8gl
4z3oh
zo1on
6zor
zor6n7a8
4z1p6
6z1r
2z1s
zs8p
2z1t
z4t3end
z4t3hei
z8t7hi
1zu
zu7ac
zu3al
zu1b4
zube7n8
zu1f2
6z5uhr
zu7in
zun2a
z7und.
zu1o
zup8fi
zu7pfl
zu1s
zu7ta
zu1z
2z1v
z7wag
z1wal
5zwang
7zwecke
zwei3s
z1wel
z1wer
z6werg
8z7wes
1zwi
zwi1s
6z1wo
z3wur
1zy
2z1z
zzi1s}
